apertium-ur-hi.ur.dix
    <pardef n="اَ/مر__n">
      <e>       <p><l>مر</l><r>مر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>مر</l><r>مر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وامِر</l><r>مر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وامِر</l><r>مر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="رِیا__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ؤں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="آب__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="قدر__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="آنت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="دعا__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ؤں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ئیں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="چنتا__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="حالت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="اخبار__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ات</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="آنسو__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ؤں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="کنی/ا__n">
      <e>       <p><l>ا</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ا</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>اں</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r>ا<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="بھوت__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/آخر__n">
      <e>       <p><l>آخر</l><r>آخر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>آخر</l><r>آخر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>اَواخِر</l><r>آخر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>اَواخِر</l><r>آخر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="قطع__n">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="پرواہ"><i>پرواہ</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رگڑ"><i>رگڑ</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سمترا"><i>سمترا</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ماہ"><i>ماہ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="برکت"><i>برکت</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دھار"><i>دھار</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خطا"><i>خطا</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آثارالصنادید"><i>آثارالصنادید</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ضلع"><i>ضلع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دوپٹا"><i>دوپٹا</i><par n="چنتا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پہل"><i>پہل</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کوکھ"><i>کوکھ</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آنسو"><i>آنسو</i><par n="آنسو__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مقطع"><i>مقطع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تنازع"><i>تنازع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آب"><i>آب</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مجموع"><i>مجموع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خوشبو"><i>خوشبو</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رابط"><i>رابط</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فقر"><i>فقر</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="وجہ"><i>وجہ</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آمد"><i>آمد</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چنیا"><i>چنی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مرقع"><i>مرقع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تناؤ"><i>تناؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="قدر"><i>قدر</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="صَدا"><i>صَدا</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چنتا"><i>چنتا</i><par n="چنتا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نقل"><i>نقل</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آبرو"><i>آبرو</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="وخت"><i>وخت</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کلاس"><i>کلاس</i><par n="قدر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چڑیا"><i>چڑی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ادا"><i>ادا</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بُرْقَع"><i>بُرْقَع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آسانیا"><i>آسانی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آخردماغ"><i>آخردماغ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اخبار"><i>اخبار</i><par n="اخبار__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ٹکیا"><i>ٹکی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مالا"><i>مالا</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="قطع"><i>قطع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پڑیا"><i>پڑی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ہنڈیا"><i>ہنڈی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بوڑھیا"><i>بوڑھی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آخرالزمان"><i>آخرالزمان</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="واقع"><i>واقع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="منبع"><i>منبع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رِیا"><i>رِیا</i><par n="رِیا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="التجا"><i>التجا</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آگیا"><i>آگیا</i><par n="رِیا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بدؤ"><i>بدؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="وبا"><i>وبا</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آْباد"><i>آْباد</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="برتاؤ"><i>برتاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مطلع"><i>مطلع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="الاؤ"><i>الاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مینا"><i>مینا</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آنت"><i>آنت</i><par n="آنت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ڈِبْیا"><i>ڈِبْی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مواقع"><i>مواقع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گڑیا"><i>گڑی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تَمَنّا"><i>تَمَنّا</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مجمع"><i>مجمع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حَیا"><i>حَیا</i><par n="رِیا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پڑاؤ"><i>پڑاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آیا"><i>آیا</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="لونڈیا"><i>لونڈی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جفا"><i>جفا</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چِڑْیا"><i>چِڑْی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آداب"><i>آداب</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آخر"><i></i><par n="/آخر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اَمر"><i>اَ</i><par n="اَ/مر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کنیا"><i>کنی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بھوت"><i>بھوت</i><par n="بھوت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="منافع"><i>منافع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ندیا"><i>ندی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گُڑْیا"><i>گُڑْی</i><par n="کنی/ا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گَھٹا"><i>گَھٹا</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="صدا"><i>صدا</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مطالع"><i>مطالع</i><par n="قطع__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بددعا"><i>بددعا</i><par n="دعا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سبھاؤ"><i>سبھاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تمام"><i>تمام</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
